apertium-eng.eng.dix
<pardef n="sh/ear__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ear</l>       <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ear</l>       <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eared</l>     <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orn</l>       <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>earing</l>    <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>earing</l>    <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>earing</l>    <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ear</l>       <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ears</l>      <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eared</l>     <r>ear<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sho/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>eing</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>eing</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>eing</l>      <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/ink__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>unk</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>inking</l>    <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>inking</l>    <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>inking</l>    <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inks</l>      <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>unk</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sl/ay__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ay</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ay</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ain</l>       <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>aying</l>     <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>aying</l>     <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>aying</l>     <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ay</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ays</l>       <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ew</l>        <r>ay<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="slid/e__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ing</l>       <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="br/eak__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eak</l>       <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eak</l>       <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oken</l>      <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>eaking</l>    <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>eaking</l>    <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>eaking</l>    <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eak</l>       <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eaks</l>      <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oke</l>       <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ake</l>       <r>eak<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sp/in__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>inning</l>    <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>inning</l>    <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>inning</l>    <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>in</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ins</l>       <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>an</l>        <r>in<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/ave__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ave</l>       <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ave</l>       <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ove</l>       <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aved</l>      <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>aving</l>     <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>aving</l>     <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>aving</l>     <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ave</l>       <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aves</l>      <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ove</l>       <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aved</l>      <r>ave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/eal__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eal</l>       <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eal</l>       <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>olen</l>      <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ealing</l>    <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ealing</l>    <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ealing</l>    <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eal</l>       <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eals</l>      <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ole</l>       <r>eal<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="break">           <i>br</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="break down">      <i>br</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/><p><l><b/>down</l><r><g><b/>down</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="break into fragments"><i>br</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into<b/>fragments</l><r><g><b/>into<b/>fragments</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="break into smithereens"><i>br</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into<b/>smithereens</l><r><g><b/>into<b/>smithereens</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="sink">            <i>s</i><par n="st/ink__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sink oneself">    <i>s</i><par n="st/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>oneself</l><r><g><b/>oneself</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="shear">           <i>sh</i><par n="sh/ear__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shoe">            <i>sho</i><par n="sho/e__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="shrink">          <i>shr</i><par n="st/ink__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slay">            <i>sl</i><par n="sl/ay__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="speak">           <i>sp</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spin">            <i>sp</i><par n="sp/in__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="speak figuratively"><i>sp</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/><p><l><b/>figuratively</l><r><g><b/>figuratively</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="speak hoarsely">  <i>sp</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/><p><l><b/>hoarsely</l><r><g><b/>hoarsely</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="speak indistinctly"><i>sp</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/><p><l><b/>indistinctly</l><r><g><b/>indistinctly</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="speak rhetorically"><i>sp</i><par n="br/eak__vblex"/><p><l><b/>rhetorically</l><r><g><b/>rhetorically</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="spin yarn">       <i>sp</i><par n="sp/in__vblex"/><p><l><b/>yarn</l><r><g><b/>yarn</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="stave">           <i>st</i><par n="st/ave__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="steal">           <i>st</i><par n="st/eal__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stink">           <i>st</i><par n="st/ink__vblex"/></e>
